Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, as


last amended by Section 8, Chapter 343, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2-101), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-101. As used in the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act:


1. “Acute pain” means pain, whether resulting from disease,


accidental trauma, intentional trauma, or other cause that the


practitioner reasonably expects to last only a short period of time.


Acute pain does not include chronic pain, pain being treated as part

Req. No. 2350 Page 1


of cancer care, hospice or other end-of-life care, or pain being


treated as part of palliative care;


2. “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled


dangerous substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion or


any other means, to the body of a patient, animal or research


subject by:


a. a practitioner (or, in the presence of the


practitioner, by the authorized agent of the


practitioner), or


b. the patient or research subject at the direction and


in the presence of the practitioner;


3. “Agent” means a peace officer appointed by and who acts on


behalf of the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control or an authorized person who acts on behalf


of or at the direction of a person who manufactures, distributes,


dispenses, prescribes, administers or uses for scientific purposes


controlled dangerous substances but does not include a common or


contract carrier, public warehouser or employee thereof, or a person


required to register under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act;


4. “Anhydrous ammonia” means any substance that exhibits


cryogenic evaporative behavior and tests positive for ammonia;


5. “Board” means the Advisory Board to the Director of the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;

Req. No. 2350 Page 2


6. “Bureau” means the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control;


7. “Chronic pain” means pain that persists beyond the usual


course of an acute disease or healing of an injury. Chronic pain


may or may not be associated with an acute or chronic pathologic


process that causes continuous or intermittent pain over months or


years;


8. “Coca leaves” includes cocaine and any compound,


manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of coca


leaves, except derivatives of coca leaves which do not contain


cocaine or ecgonine;


9. “Commissioner” or “Director” means the Director of the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;


10. “Control” means to add, remove or change the placement of a


drug, substance or immediate precursor under the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act;


11. “Controlled dangerous substance” means a drug, substance or


immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act or any drug, substance or


immediate precursor listed either temporarily or permanently as a


federally controlled substance. Any conflict between state and


federal law with regard to the particular schedule in which a


substance is listed shall be resolved in favor of state law;



Req. No. 2350 Page 3


12. “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which,


or the container or labeling of which without authorization, bears


the trademark, trade name or other identifying marks, imprint,


number or device or any likeness thereof of a manufacturer,


distributor or dispenser other than the person who in fact


manufactured, distributed or dispensed the substance;


13. “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or


attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled


dangerous substance or drug paraphernalia, whether or not there is


an agency relationship;


14. “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled dangerous


substance to an ultimate user or human research subject by or


pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the


prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling or compounding


necessary to prepare the substance for such distribution.


“Dispenser” is a practitioner who delivers a controlled dangerous


substance to an ultimate user or human research subject;


15. “Distribute” means to deliver other than by administering


or dispensing a controlled dangerous substance;


16. “Distributor” means a commercial entity engaged in the


distribution or reverse distribution of narcotics and dangerous


drugs and who complies with all regulations promulgated by the


federal Drug Enforcement Administration and the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;

Req. No. 2350 Page 4


17. “Drug” means articles:


a. recognized in the official United States Pharmacopeia,


official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United


States, or official National Formulary, or any


supplement to any of them,


b. intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,


treatment or prevention of disease in man or other


animals,


c. other than food, intended to affect the structure or


any function of the body of man or other animals, and


d. intended for use as a component of any article


specified in this paragraph;


provided, however, the term drug does not include devices or their


components, parts or accessories;


18. “Drug paraphernalia” means all equipment, products, and


materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,


harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,


processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,


storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or


otherwise introducing into the human body, a controlled dangerous


substance in violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act including, but not limited to:



Req. No. 2350 Page 5


a. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically


for use in planting, propagating, cultivating,


growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which


is a controlled dangerous substance or from which a


controlled dangerous substance can be derived,


b. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically


for use in manufacturing, compounding, converting,


producing, processing, or preparing controlled


dangerous substances,


c. isomerization devices used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in increasing the


potency of any species of plant which is a controlled


dangerous substance,


d. testing equipment used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in identifying or in analyzing


the strength, effectiveness, or purity of controlled


dangerous substances,


e. scales and balances used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in weighing or


measuring controlled dangerous substances,


f. diluents and adulterants, such as quinine


hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and


lactose used, intended for use, or fashioned



Req. No. 2350 Page 6


specifically for use in cutting controlled dangerous


substances,


g. separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or


fashioned specifically for use in removing twigs and


seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining,


marijuana,


h. blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing


devices used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in compounding controlled


dangerous substances,


i. capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers


used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically for


use in packaging small quantities of controlled


dangerous substances,


j. containers and other objects used, intended for use,


or fashioned specifically for use in parenterally


injecting controlled dangerous substances into the


human body,


k. hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used,


intended for use, or fashioned specifically for use in


parenterally injecting controlled dangerous substances


into the human body, except as authorized by Section


2-1101 of this title,



Req. No. 2350 Page 7


l. objects used, intended for use, or fashioned


specifically for use in ingesting, inhaling, or


otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or


hashish oil into the human body, such as:


(1) metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or


ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent


screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls,


(2) water pipes,


(3) carburetion tubes and devices,


(4) smoking and carburetion masks,


(5) roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning


material, such as a marijuana cigarette, that has


become too small or too short to be held in the


hand,


(6) miniature cocaine spoons and cocaine vials,


(7) chamber pipes,


(8) carburetor pipes,


(9) electric pipes,


(10) air-driven pipes,


(11) chillums,


(12) bongs, or


(13) ice pipes or chillers,


m. all hidden or novelty pipes, and



Req. No. 2350 Page 8


n. any pipe that has a tobacco bowl or chamber of less


than one-half (1/2) inch in diameter in which there is


any detectable residue of any controlled dangerous


substance as defined in this section or any other


substances not legal for possession or use;


provided, however, the term drug paraphernalia shall not include


separation gins intended for use in preparing tea or spice, clamps


used for constructing electrical equipment, water pipes designed for


ornamentation in which no detectable amount of an illegal substance


is found or pipes designed and used solely for smoking tobacco,


traditional pipes of an American Indian tribal religious ceremony,


antique pipes that are thirty (30) years of age or older, or drug


testing strips possessed by a person for purposes of determining the


presence of fentanyl or a fentanyl-related compound;


19. “Drug-dependent person” means a person who is using a


controlled dangerous substance and who is in a state of psychic or


physical dependence, or both, arising from administration of that


controlled dangerous substance on a continuous basis. Drug


dependence is characterized by behavioral and other responses which


include a strong compulsion to take the substance on a continuous


basis in order to experience its psychic effects, or to avoid the


discomfort of its absence;


20. “Harm-reduction services” means programs established to:



Req. No. 2350 Page 9


a. reduce the spread of infectious diseases related to


injection drug use,


b. reduce drug dependency, overdose deaths, and


associated complications, and


c. increase safe recovery and disposal of used syringes


and sharp waste;


21. “Hazardous materials” means materials, whether solid,


liquid, or gas, which are toxic to human, animal, aquatic, or plant


life, and the disposal of such materials is controlled by state or


federal guidelines;


22. 21. “Home care agency” means any sole proprietorship,


partnership, association, corporation, or other organization which


administers, offers, or provides home care services, for a fee or


pursuant to a contract for such services, to clients in their place


of residence;


23. 22. “Home care services” means skilled or personal care


services provided to clients in their place of residence for a fee;


24. 23. “Hospice” means a centrally administered, nonprofit or


for-profit, medically directed, nurse-coordinated program which


provides a continuum of home and inpatient care for the terminally


ill patient and the patient’s family. Such term shall also include


a centrally administered, nonprofit or for-profit, medically


directed, nurse-coordinated program if such program is licensed


pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous

Req. No. 2350 Page 10


Substances Act. A hospice program offers palliative and supportive


care to meet the special needs arising out of the physical,


emotional and spiritual stresses which are experienced during the


final stages of illness and during dying and bereavement. This care


is available twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week,


and is provided on the basis of need, regardless of ability to pay.


“Class A” Hospice refers to Medicare-certified hospices. “Class B”


refers to all other providers of hospice services;


25. 24. “Imitation controlled substance” means a substance that


is not a controlled dangerous substance, which by dosage unit


appearance, color, shape, size, markings or by representations made,


would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance is a


controlled dangerous substance, or is a drug intended solely for


veterinary purposes that is not a controlled dangerous substance and


is being used outside of the scope of practice or normal course of


business, as defined by the State Board of Veterinary Medical


Examiners, or is a federal Food and Drug Administration-approved


drug that is not a controlled dangerous substance and is being used


outside the scope of approval for illicit purposes such as


adulterating or lacing other controlled dangerous substances. In


the event the appearance of the dosage unit or use is not reasonably


sufficient to establish that the substance is an imitation


controlled substance, the court or authority concerned should


consider, in addition to all other factors, the following factors:

Req. No. 2350 Page 11


a. statements made by an owner or by any other person in


control of the substance concerning the nature of the


substance, or its use or effect,


b. statements made to the recipient that the substance


may be resold for inordinate profit,


c. whether the substance is packaged in a manner normally


used for illicit controlled substances,


d. evasive tactics or actions utilized by the owner or


person in control of the substance to avoid detection


by law enforcement authorities,


e. prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or any other


person in control of the object, under state or


federal law related to controlled substances or fraud,


and


f. the proximity of the substances to controlled


dangerous substances;


26. 25. “Immediate precursor” means a substance which the


Director has found to be and by regulation designates as being the


principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and


which is an immediate chemical intermediary used, or likely to be


used, in the manufacture of a controlled dangerous substance, the


control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail or limit such


manufacture;



Req. No. 2350 Page 12


27. 26. “Initial prescription” means a prescription issued to a


patient who:


a. has never previously been issued a prescription for


the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent in the past


year, or


b. requires a prescription for the drug or its


pharmaceutical equivalent due to a surgical procedure


or new acute event and has previously had a


prescription for the drug or its pharmaceutical


equivalent within the past year.


When determining whether a patient was previously issued a


prescription for a drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent, the


practitioner shall consult with the patient and review the medical


record and prescription monitoring information of the patient;


28. 27. “Isomer” means the optical isomer, except as used in


subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title and paragraph 4


of subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title. As used in


subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title, isomer means the


optical, positional, or geometric isomer. As used in paragraph 4 of


subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title, the term isomer means


the optical or geometric isomer;


29. 28. “Laboratory” means a laboratory approved by the


Director as proper to be entrusted with the custody of controlled



Req. No. 2350 Page 13


dangerous substances and the use of controlled dangerous substances


for scientific and medical purposes and for purposes of instruction;


30. 29. “Manufacture” means the production, preparation,


propagation, compounding or processing of a controlled dangerous


substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from


substances of natural or synthetic origin, or independently by means


of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and chemical


synthesis. “Manufacturer” includes any person who packages,


repackages or labels any container of any controlled dangerous


substance, except practitioners who dispense or compound


prescription orders for delivery to the ultimate consumer;


31. 30. “Marijuana” means all parts of the plant Cannabis


sativa L., whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin


extracted from any part of such plant; and every compound,


manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of such plant,


its seeds or resin, but shall not include:


a. the mature stalks of such plant or fiber produced from


such stalks,


b. oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant,


including cannabidiol derived from the seeds of the


marijuana plant,


c. any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,


mixture or preparation of such mature stalks (except



Req. No. 2350 Page 14


the resin extracted therefrom), including cannabidiol


derived from mature stalks, fiber, oil or cake,


d. the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable


of germination,


e. for any person participating in a clinical trial to


administer cannabidiol for the treatment of severe


forms of epilepsy pursuant to Section 2-802 of this


title, a drug or substance approved by the federal


Food and Drug Administration for use by those


participants,


f. for any person or the parents, legal guardians or


caretakers of the person who have received a written


certification from a physician licensed in this state


that the person has been diagnosed by a physician as


having Lennox-Gastaut syndrome, Dravet syndrome, also


known as severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, or any


other severe form of epilepsy that is not adequately


treated by traditional medical therapies, spasticity


due to multiple sclerosis or due to paraplegia,


intractable nausea and vomiting, appetite stimulation


with chronic wasting diseases, the substance


cannabidiol, a nonpsychoactive cannabinoid, found in


the plant Cannabis sativa L. or any other preparation


thereof, that has a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration

Req. No. 2350 Page 15


not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) and


that is delivered to the patient in the form of a


liquid,


g. any federal Food and Drug Administration-approved drug


or substance, or


h. industrial hemp, from the plant Cannabis sativa L. and


any part of such plant, whether growing or not, with a


delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration not more


than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-


weight basis which shall only be grown pursuant to the


Oklahoma Industrial Hemp Program and may be shipped


intrastate and interstate;


32. 31. “Medical purpose” means an intention to utilize a


controlled dangerous substance for physical or mental treatment, for


diagnosis, or for the prevention of a disease condition not in


violation of any state or federal law and not for the purpose of


satisfying physiological or psychological dependence or other abuse;


33. 32. “Mid-level practitioner” means an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse as defined and within parameters specified in


Section 567.3a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a certified


animal euthanasia technician as defined in Section 698.2 of Title 59


of the Oklahoma Statutes, or an animal control officer registered by


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control


under subsection B of Section 2-301 of this title within the

Req. No. 2350 Page 16


parameters of such officer’s duties under Sections 501 through 508


of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. 33. “Narcotic drug” means any of the following, whether


produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of


vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis,


or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:


a. opium, coca leaves and opiates,


b. a compound, manufacture, salt, derivative or


preparation of opium, coca leaves or opiates,


c. cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and


salts of isomers,


d. ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers and


salts of isomers, and


e. a substance, and any compound, manufacture, salt,


derivative or preparation thereof, which is chemically


identical with any of the substances referred to in


subparagraphs a through d of this paragraph, except


that the words narcotic drug as used in Section 2-101


et seq. of this title shall not include decocainized


coca leaves or extracts of coca leaves, which extracts


do not contain cocaine or ecgonine;


35. 34. “Opiate” or “opioid” means any Schedule II, III, IV or


V substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining


liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a

Req. No. 2350 Page 17


drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining


liability. The terms do not include, unless specifically designated


as controlled under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act,


the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methyl-morphinan and its


salts (dextromethorphan). The terms do include the racemic and


levorotatory forms;


36. 35. “Opium poppy” means the plant of the species Papaver


somniferum L., except the seeds thereof;


37. 36. “Palliative care” means a specialized medical service


for people of any age and at any stage of a serious illness or life-


altering medical event that focuses on navigating complex medical


decisions while providing patient autonomy and access to


information. Utilizing a holistic and interdisciplinary team


approach, palliative care addresses physical, intellectual,


emotional, social, and spiritual needs. Palliative care may be


provided in the inpatient, outpatient, or home care setting and


strives to improve quality of life for both the patient and the


family;


38. 37. “Patient-provider agreement” means a written contract


or agreement that is executed between a practitioner and a patient


prior to the commencement of treatment for chronic pain using an


opioid drug as a means to:





Req. No. 2350 Page 18


a. explain the possible risk of development of physical


or psychological dependence in the patient and prevent


the possible development of addiction,


b. document the understanding of both the practitioner


and the patient regarding the patient-provider


agreement of the patient,


c. establish the rights of the patient in association


with treatment and the obligations of the patient in


relation to the responsible use, discontinuation of


use, and storage of opioid drugs, including any


restrictions on the refill of prescriptions or the


acceptance of opioid prescriptions from practitioners,


d. identify the specific medications and other modes of


treatment, including physical therapy or exercise,


relaxation, or psychological counseling, that are


included as a part of the patient-provider agreement,


e. specify the measures the practitioner may employ to


monitor the compliance of the patient including, but


not limited to, random specimen screens and pill


counts, and


f. delineate the process for terminating the agreement,


including the consequences if the practitioner has


reason to believe that the patient is not complying


with the terms of the agreement. Compliance with the

Req. No. 2350 Page 19


consent items described in this paragraph shall


constitute a valid, informed consent for opioid


therapy. The practitioner shall be held harmless from


civil litigation for failure to treat pain if the


event occurs because of nonadherence by the patient


with any of the provisions of the patient-provider


agreement;


39. 38. “Peace officer” means a police officer, sheriff, deputy


sheriff, district attorney’s investigator, investigator from the


Office of the Attorney General, or any other person elected or


appointed by law to enforce any of the criminal laws of this state


or of the United States;


40. 39. “Person” means an individual, corporation, government


or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate,


trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity;


41. 40. “Poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the


opium poppy, after mowing;


42. 41. “Practitioner” means:


a. (1) a medical doctor or osteopathic physician,


(2) a dentist,


(3) a podiatrist,


(4) an optometrist,


(5) a veterinarian,



Req. No. 2350 Page 20


(6) an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse under the


supervision of a licensed medical doctor or


osteopathic physician, or a physician assistant,


(7) a scientific investigator, or


(8) any other person,


licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to


prescribe, distribute, dispense, conduct research with


respect to, use for scientific purposes or administer


a controlled dangerous substance in the course of


professional practice or research in this state, or


b. a pharmacy, hospital, laboratory or other institution


licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to


distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect


to, use for scientific purposes or administer a


controlled dangerous substance in the course of


professional practice or research in this state;


43. 42. “Production” includes the manufacture, planting,


cultivation, growing or harvesting of a controlled dangerous


substance;


44. 43. “Serious illness” means a medical illness or physical


injury or condition that substantially affects quality of life for


more than a short period of time. Serious illness includes, but is


not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease or related dementias, lung



Req. No. 2350 Page 21


disease, cancer, heart failure, renal failure, liver failure, or


chronic, unremitting, or intractable pain such as neuropathic pain;


45. 44. “State” means the State of Oklahoma or any other state


of the United States;


46. 45. “Straw person” or “straw party”, also known as a


“front”, means a third party who:


a. is put up in name only to take part in a transaction


or otherwise is a nominal party to a transaction with


no actual control,


b. acts on behalf of another person to obtain title to


property and executes documents and instruments the


principal may direct respecting property, or


c. purchases property for another for the purpose of


concealing the identity of the real purchaser or to


accomplish some purpose otherwise in violation of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


47. 46. “Surgical procedure” means a procedure that is


performed for the purpose of structurally altering the human body by


incision or destruction of tissues as part of the practice of


medicine. This term includes the diagnostic or therapeutic


treatment of conditions or disease processes by use of instruments


such as lasers, ultrasound, ionizing, radiation, scalpels, probes,


or needles that cause localized alteration or transportation of live


human tissue by cutting, burning, vaporizing, freezing, suturing,

Req. No. 2350 Page 22


probing, or manipulating by closed reduction for major dislocations


or fractures, or otherwise altering by any mechanical, thermal,


light-based, electromagnetic, or chemical means;


48. 47. a. “Synthetic controlled substance” means a


substance:


(1) the chemical structure of which is substantially


similar to the chemical structure of a controlled


dangerous substance in Schedule I or II,


(2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or


hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous


system that is substantially similar to or


greater than the stimulant, depressant, or


hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous


system of a controlled dangerous substance in


Schedule I or II, or


(3) with respect to a particular person, which such


person represents or intends to have a stimulant,


depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the


central nervous system that is substantially


similar to or greater than the stimulant,


depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the


central nervous system of a controlled dangerous


substance in Schedule I or II.



Req. No. 2350 Page 23


b. The designation of gamma-butyrolactone or any other


chemical as a precursor, pursuant to Section 2-322 of


this title, does not preclude a finding pursuant to


subparagraph a of this paragraph that the chemical is


a synthetic controlled substance.


c. Synthetic controlled substance does not include:


(1) a controlled dangerous substance,


(2) any substance for which there is an approved new


drug application,


(3) with respect to a particular person any


substance, if an exemption is in effect for


investigational use, for that person under the


provisions of Section 505 of the Federal Food,


Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C., Section 355,


to the extent conduct with respect to such


substance is pursuant to such exemption, or


(4) any substance to the extent not intended for


human consumption before such an exemption takes


effect with respect to that substance.


d. Prima facie evidence that a substance containing


salvia divinorum has been enhanced, concentrated, or


chemically or physically altered shall give rise to a


rebuttable presumption that the substance is a


synthetic controlled substance;

Req. No. 2350 Page 24


49. 48. “Tetrahydrocannabinols” means all substances that have


been chemically synthesized to emulate the tetrahydrocannabinols of


marijuana, specifically including any tetrahydrocannabinols derived


from industrial hemp; and


50. 49. “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a


controlled dangerous substance for the person’s own use or for the


use of a member of the person’s household or for administration to


an animal owned by the person or by a member of the person’s


household.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-101.1. In determining whether an object is “drug


paraphernalia” drug paraphernalia, a court or jury shall consider,


in addition to all other logically relevant factors, the following:


1. Statements by an owner or by anyone in control of the object


concerning its use;


2. The proximity of the object, in time and space, to a direct


violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act;


3. The proximity of the object to controlled dangerous


substances;


4. The existence of any residue of controlled dangerous


substances on the object;


5. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the intent of an owner,


or of anyone in control of the object, to deliver it to any person

Req. No. 2350 Page 25


who intends to use the object to facilitate a violation of the


Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act. The innocence of an


owner, or of anyone in control of the object, as to a direct


violation of this act the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances


Act shall not prevent a finding that the object is intended for use,


or fashioned specifically for use, as drug paraphernalia;


6. Instructions, oral or written, provided with the object


which either state directly or imply that the object is to be used


for the consumption of controlled dangerous substances;


7. Descriptive materials accompanying the object which explain


or depict its use as an object for the consumption of controlled


dangerous substances;


8. The manner in which the object is displayed for sale;


9. Whether the owner, or anyone in control of the object, is a


legitimate supplier of like or related items to the community, such


as a licensed distributor or dealer of tobacco products;


10. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the ratio of sales of


the object or objects to the total sales of the business enterprise;


11. The existence and scope of legitimate uses for the object


in the community; and


12. Expert testimony concerning its use.


Provided, nothing in this section shall apply to objects in the


possession of harm-reduction services providers as authorized by


Section 3 of this act.

Req. No. 2350 Page 26


SECTION 3. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-1101, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2350 DC 1/15/2026 11:07:17 AM































Req. No. 2350 Page 27